Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.110

Disposition of proceeds of sales.

(1) No claims are allowed against the county from any municipality, school district, road district or other taxing district for taxes levied on property acquired by the county by tax deed under the provisions of this chapter, but all taxes must at the time of deeding the property be thereby canceled. However, the proceeds of any sale of any property acquired by the county by tax deed must first be applied to reimburse the county for the costs of foreclosure and sale. The remainder of the proceeds, if any, must be applied to pay any amounts deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW on the property, including accrued interest, and outstanding at the time the county acquired the property by tax deed. The remainder of the proceeds, if any, must be justly apportioned to the various funds existing at the date of the sale, in the territory in which such property is located, according to the tax levies of the year last in process of collection.

(2) For purposes of this section, "costs of foreclosure and sale" means those costs of foreclosing on the property that, when collected, are subject to RCW 84.56.020(13), and the direct costs incurred by the county in selling the property.

[ 2019 c 332 s 3; 2013 c 221 s 2; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.230. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 130 s 132; RRS s 11293; prior: 1899 c 141 s 28. Formerly RCW 84.64.230.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 332: See note following RCW 84.56.029.